Washington statutes.
RCW 19.110.130

Liability of seller for violation of chapter—Remedies—Damages.

Any seller who violates any provision of this chapter is liable to the purchaser. The purchaser may sue for actual damages, or an injunction, or rescission, or other relief.

In addition, the purchaser may sue for costs of suit, including a reasonable attorney's fee. The court may increase the amount of damages awarded up to three times the amount of actual damages.

[ 1981 c 155 s 13.]